Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 351 Department for Natural Resources
351.140.
Duties and authority of mine inspectors — Frequency of underground and surface mine inspections.

Each mine inspector shall give his entire time and attention to the duties of his office, which shall consist of the following:

Inspecting mines and aiding, under the direction of the commissioner, in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of the law relating to the inspection of mines;

Training officials and workmen in and about the mines in first aid and mine rescue methods;

Advising officials and workmen in methods pertaining to safety in all its phases and in methods pertaining to the prevention of mine fires and explosions;

Taking charge of mine rescue and recovery work whenever a mine fire, mine explosion or other serious accident occurs within his district, and the commissioner is not present, and assisting in such work in other districts when so directed by the commissioner;

Reopening mines or portions of mines that have been sealed on account of fire or any other cause, when directed by the commissioner to do so;

Inspecting each underground and surface mine in accordance with KRS 351.090(1);

It shall be permissible for a mine inspector to inspect any coal preparation plant or surface facility of any mining operation of coal including any overland coal belts; and

A mine inspector shall have the express authority to enter upon the premises of and inspect any coal mine, including any overland coal belts, at any reasonable time.

HISTORY:

2739-17, 2739-18: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 3; 1952, ch. 162, § 11; 1972, ch. 298, § 11; 1976, ch. 174, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 18; 1978, ch. 301, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 3, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 308, § 14, effective April 9, 1996; 2006, ch. 185, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 9, effective January 1, 2009; 2017 ch. 72, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.150.
Reports of mine inspectors.

Each mine inspector shall each week report in writing to the commissioner of the department the number and condition of all mines inspected by him during the week.

Each mine inspector shall each week deliver to the commissioner of the department a written report showing the condition of each mine inspected by him and, at the same time, shall deliver a copy of such report to the operator or the superintendent of each mine inspected and another copy thereof to the mine committee at such mine so inspected if requested and at the same time each mine inspector shall post a copy of such inspection report on a bulletin board at a prominent place of the operating company or mine where it may conveniently be read by any of the mine employees.

Each mine inspector shall, within fifteen (15) days after the close of each calendar year, file with the commissioner a report of his proceedings during the calendar year, and give such information concerning the mines and mining conditions in his district as is appropriate and required by the commissioner.

History.

2739-18: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 4; 1972, ch. 298, § 12.

351.160.
Annual report of commissioner — Record and index of inspections and reports — Certified copies.

The commissioner of the department shall annually make a report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission of his proceedings during the preceding calendar year. The annual report shall be prepared and printed as soon as possible after the close of the calendar year. The annual report shall cover the complete operation of the mines in this Commonwealth during the preceding calendar year, enumerating all accidents occurring in or about any such mines during that year, and giving such other information as the commissioner deems useful, and making such suggestions as he deems important as to further legislation on the subject of mining.

The commissioner shall keep and index a permanent record of all inspections made by himself and of all reports relating to inspection of mines furnished to him by mine inspectors. All such records of the department shall be public records and shall, at all times, be open to the inspection of the public, and shall be laid before the Governor or the Legislative Research Commission upon their request at any time.

The department shall furnish certified copies of any such records, when requested to do so, upon payment of such fee as is generally charged by courts of record for certified copies. Such fee shall be paid into the Treasury of the state.

History.

2739-10, 2739-11: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 5; 1972, ch. 298, § 13; 2000, ch. 104, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 149, § 10, effective March 20, 2001.

351.170.
Reports of licensee — Alcohol and substance abuse reports.

All reports of any facility licensed pursuant to this chapter shall be made to the director. The licensee of each commercial coal mine shall give at the end of each calendar year accurate information, on blank forms furnished by the commissioner, as to the number of accidents that have occurred, the number of persons employed, the tons of coal mined, and any other related information that the commissioner requests.

The operator or superintendent of each licensed facility shall report, by the close of the next business day, any certified persons who:

Have been discharged for violation of a company’s substance or alcohol abuse policies;

Refused to submit to a test required by the company’s substance or alcohol abuse policies or KRS

351.182

,

351.183

,

351.184

,

351.185

, and

352.180

; or

Tested positive and failed to complete an employee assistance program.

HISTORY:

2739-12, 2739-13: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 12; 1972, ch. 298, § 14; 1994, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 308, § 15, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 241, § 18, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 87, § 19, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section grants authority to the Commissioner that is broad enough to encompass fire boss reports and, therefore, the Commissioner can require monthly fire boss reports to be filed with the Department of Mines and Minerals.

OAG 77-215

.

While the Commissioner of the Department of Mines and Minerals can require monthly fire boss reports to be filed with the Department, if the Department requires that fire boss reports be received only from mine operators of mines located below the water table, then a relationship between mine safety and the need to impose different reporting requirements on mines below the water table as a class as opposed to mines above the water table must be shown to be reasonably related to the purpose of this statute so that such regulation will not be one prohibited by Ky. Const., §§ 59 and 60 prohibiting special and local legislation.

OAG 77-215

.

351.173.
Notice of possibility of subsidence — Language required in deed of conveyance.

Any person may file a notice in the alphabetical cross-index in the county clerk’s office in the county where underground coal mining has occurred stating that the mineral has been extracted and that the surface overlying or adjacent to the underground workings may be subject to subsidence. The notice shall be indexed under the name of the current surface owner or lessee of record whose land overlies the underground workings, as well as that of the mineral owner and lessee, and shall be noted on the deed of conveyance in each future conveyance of both the surface and mineral estate. The language in the deed of conveyance shall state the following:

“THE COAL UNDERLYING THIS PROPERTY HAS BEEN EXTRACTED AND THE SURFACE OVERLYING OR ADJACENT TO THE UNDERGROUND WORKINGS MAY BE SUBJECT TO SUBSIDENCE. ANY STRUCTURES ERECTED HEREAFTER SHOULD BE DESIGNED AND CONSTRUCTED SO AS TO PREVENT OR MINIMIZE ANY SUBSIDENCE DAMAGE.”

The failure to include the required language in the deed shall not affect the validity of the deed as between the parties or constructive notice upon the recording of the deed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 419, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

351.175.
Provisions concerning license to operate mine — Submissions required for license — Revocation of license.

The operation of a coal mine in Kentucky is a privilege granted by the Commonwealth of Kentucky to a licensee who satisfies the requirements of this section and demonstrates that the mine is or will be operated in a safe manner and in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth.

Within forty-five (45) days after January 1, 1953, and of each year thereafter, the owner, operator, lessee, or licensee of each mine shall procure from the department a license to operate the mine, and the license shall not be transferable. Any owner, operator, lessee, or licensee who assumes control of a mine, opens a new mine, or reopens an abandoned mine during any calendar year shall procure a license before mining operations are begun.

The license shall be in printed form as the commissioner may prescribe and when issued shall be kept posted at a conspicuous place near the main entrance of the mine.

Requests for a license shall be made to the department and shall be accompanied by a United States postal money order or cashier’s check drawn in favor of the State Treasurer in an amount established by administrative regulations of a minimum of one hundred dollars ($100) and a maximum of fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500). The license shall be issued when the following are properly submitted to the commissioner:

The annual report of the licensee and the annual mine map required in KRS

351.170

and

352.450

;

A certification from the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims that the licensee has provided positive proof of compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 342;

A certification from the commissioner of the Department of Revenue that the licensee is not a “delinquent taxpayer” as defined in KRS Chapter 131;

Mine seal construction plan filed with the state and approved by MSHA;

Roof control plan filed with the state and approved by MSHA;

The ventilation plan required in KRS

352.020

; and

An approved emergency action plan required by KRS

352.640

.

The department shall immediately revoke any license if the department receives:

Withdrawal of the certification of compliance with KRS Chapter 342 issued by the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims; or

Notice from the commissioner of the Department of Revenue that the licensee is a “delinquent taxpayer” as defined in KRS Chapter 131.

The commissioner, the director of the Division of Mine Safety, or the mine safety specialist shall have the authority to stop production or close any mine whose operator fails to procure a license or fails to furnish a certification of workers’ compensation coverage as required under this section.

The department shall be authorized to seek injunctive relief for any violation of this section. Revocation of a license by the department shall be an administrative function of the department. Appeals from revocation by the department shall be brought in Franklin Circuit Court.

A license which has been revoked under the “delinquent taxpayer” provision shall not be reissued until a written tax clearance has been received from the commissioner of revenue.

No mine underlying a cemetery shall be licensed by the commissioner unless two-thirds (2/3) of the governing body of that cemetery vote in approval of the operation. The application for a license shall contain an affidavit setting forth the approval of the cemetery’s governing body. This subsection applies only to those cemeteries with governing bodies.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 14; 1970, ch. 79, § 1; 1972, ch. 298, § 15; 1974, ch. 258, § 2; 1976, ch. 171, § 1; 1976, ch. 220, § 1; 1978, ch. 233, § 36, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 301, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 277, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 214, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1987 (Ex. Sess), ch. 1, §
60, effective January 4, 1988; 1988, ch. 415, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 271, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 308, § 16, effective April 9, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 685, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 185, § 11, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 10, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 1900, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 87, § 20, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.177.
Special task force to investigate illegal mining — Prosecution of violators — “Illegal mining fund” established. [Repealed.]

351.180.
Inspection of mine scales — Fee. [Repealed.]

351.182.
Drug- and alcohol-free status required for miner certification — Proof — Costs of testing — Breath alcohol device at examination site — Ten-panel urine test.

All applicants for certification as new miners and all initial applicants for all other certifications provided for in this chapter shall provide proof of drug- and alcohol-free status prior to certification in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Proof of drug- and alcohol-free status shall be provided in one (1) of two (2) methods:

By participation in a drug and alcohol testing program offered by the division and paid for by the applicant, in accordance with this section and KRS

351.183

; or

By the submission of drug and alcohol test results from other sources, as provided in KRS

351.183

(2).

If a newly certified miner gains employment in the coal industry, the initial employer shall reimburse the certified miner for the cost of one (1) drug and alcohol test required by this section and KRS

351.183

,

351.184

, and

351.185

.

If the applicant is currently certified in any category other than that for which he is applying by the division and the applicant is currently employed in the coal industry, the applicant’s employer shall reimburse the applicant for the cost of one (1) drug and alcohol test required by this section and KRS

351.183

,

351.184

, and

351.185

.

The fee charged to an applicant for the drug and alcohol tests offered by the division shall not exceed the actual cost of collection, analysis, and medical review officer (MRO) review.

The division shall provide, at each site of examinations for the certifications provided for in Chapter 351, a breath alcohol testing device and a person certified in the operation of the breath alcohol testing device. The breath alcohol test shall be administered prior to examination to determine the applicant’s alcohol-free status. The division may satisfy the requirement to furnish an alcohol testing device and certified personnel by:

The use of equipment and appropriately certified personnel of the division;

A memorandum of agreement with state or local police agencies for the provision of equipment and appropriately trained personnel at the examination site; or

Inclusion of breath alcohol testing as part of the contract to provide drug testing and collection services set out in KRS 351.183(1).

A breath alcohol concentration of.04 shall be the maximum acceptable level of concentration for participation in the examination and subsequent certification.

Except for an alternative testing protocol provided for post-accident victims under KRS 352.180(6) to (8), the minimum testing protocol acceptable for the establishment of drug-free status for certification under KRS Chapter 351 shall be at least a ten (10) panel urine test that shall include testing for the following substances:

Amphetamines;

Cannabanoids/THC;

Cocaine;

Opiates;

Phencyclidine (PCP);

Benzodiazepines;

Propoxyphene;

Buprenorphine;

Methadone;

Barbiturates; and

The remaining panels to be used in the urine test shall be set by order of the Mine Safety Review Commission no later than June 1 of each year.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 241, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 89, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 87, § 21, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 85, § 10, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 241, sec. 2, subsec. (7), provides: “A breath alcohol concentration of four tenths of a percent (.04) shall be the maximum acceptable level of concentration for participation in the examination and subsequent certification.” The words “four tenths of a percent” and the parentheses around “.04” were removed during codification to correct a manifest clerical error that occurred in the drafting process. Materials in the bill folder for House Bill 572 (which became
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 241) show that the bill was drafted to be an exact copy of a bill requested and later introduced as Senate Bill 201, the initial proposed draft of which provided: “A breath alcohol concentration of .04 shall be the maximum acceptable level of concentration for participation in the examination(s) and subsequent certification(s).” Materials in the bill folder for Senate Bill 201 indicate that the erroneous phrase was inserted during the drafting process to conform with the rules for cardinal numbers set forth in the Bill Drafting Manual of the Kentucky General Assembly. The Reviser of Statutes has made this correction under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1).

351.183.
Contracts for specimen collection and laboratory testing services — Standards, procedures, and protocol — Criteria for proof from other sources — Annual publication of certified collection and testing providers.

The division may contract with qualified companies to provide the collection of samples and administer the required drug and alcohol tests. The contract may provide that the collection of samples or testing be subcontracted, except that the contract shall require:

The contractor and any subcontractors to follow all standards, procedures, and protocols set forth by the United States Department of Health and Human Services’ Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) for the collection and testing required by KRS

351.182

and this section;

The contractor’s or subcontractor’s drug-testing protocol shall be a ten (10) panel test described in KRS

351.182

(8) and any other test required by order of the Mine Safety Review Commission; and

The contractor or the subcontractor shall provide a medical review officer (MRO) who shall:

Possess the ability and medical training necessary to verify positive confirmed test results and evaluate those results in relation to an applicant’s medical history or other biomedical information; and

Follow all procedures outlined in the SAMHSA Medical Review Officer Manual.

The director of the Division of Mine Safety may accept proof of drug- and alcohol-free status from other sources whose tests conform to the requirements set forth in KRS 351.182(7) and (8) and in accordance with KRS 351.182(2)(b) under the following conditions:

An applicant shall submit a request for acceptance of his or her drug- and alcohol-free status to the director accompanied by pass/fail results of a drug and alcohol test taken within thirty (30) days prior to the request; and

The test results shall have been performed by laboratories certified in accordance with the National Laboratory Certification Program (NLCP) by the United States Department of Health and Human Services Administration’s SAMHSA and in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

The division shall maintain and publish annually a list of certified specimen collection services and testing laboratories from which it will accept data.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 241, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 89, § 5, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 87, § 22, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Researh Commission Note.

(6/24/2015). In codifying subsection (2)(a) of this statute, the Reviser of Statutes has changed the term “executive director” to “director.” This substitution is consistent with amendments adopted in
2015 Ky. Acts ch. 87 reorganizing the Department for Natural Resources. The Reviser has made this change under the authority of
KRS 7.136(2).

351.184.
Division to notify applicant of test results when granting or denying certification — Notification of options — Issuance after evaluation, treatment, and testing — Right of appeal.

The results of any testing performed by the division shall be given to the applicant at the time of his or her notification of the granting or denial of certification.

Certification of an applicant shall be denied if any one (1) or more of the following occur:

The applicant’s positive drug test results for any of the substances either listed in KRS

351.182

(8) or otherwise required to be tested for by order of the Mine Safety Review Commission are deemed to fail by a medical review officer;

The applicant’s blood alcohol level is above .04 concentration at the time of testing;

The applicant’s test results demonstrate the submission of an adulterated specimen; or

The applicant refuses to submit to a drug or alcohol test as required by KRS

351.182

.

Any applicant who is denied certification due to the results of the drug and alcohol testing required by KRS

351.182

may:

Appeal to the Mine Safety Review Commission within thirty (30) days of receiving the notification required under KRS 351.120(12); or

Notify the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or the director of the division within thirty (30) of receiving the notification required under KRS 351.120(12) that the applicant intends to be evaluated by a medical professional trained in substance abuse treatment, to complete any prescribed treatment, and to submit an acceptable result from a drug and alcohol test as required by KRS

351.182

.

Failure to file an appeal or failure to notify the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or the director of the division of his or her intent to comply with paragraph (a)2. of this subsection within thirty (30) days of the notification shall result in the revocation of all licenses and certifications issued by the division for a period of not less than three (3) years, and the holder shall remain ineligible for any other certification issued by the division during the revocation period. Certifications and licenses revoked under this paragraph may be reissued by:

Compliance with all training and testing requirements;

Satisfying the requirements of KRS 351.182 and

351.183

; and

Compliance with all orders of the Mine Safety Review Commission.

For the purposes of this subsection, the completion of evaluation, treatment, and submission of an acceptable drug test pursuant to paragraph (a)2. of this subsection or the revocation described under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be considered a first offense.

The licenses and certifications of a miner who notifies the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or the director of the division of his or her intent to comply with subsection (3)(a)2. of this section shall remain suspended until the miner has provided proof of the evaluation and successful completion of any prescribed treatment and has submitted a negative drug and alcohol test as required by KRS

351.182

to the division. The drug and alcohol test shall be taken no more than thirty (30) days prior to the submission of the proof required by this section. Upon receipt and review of the proof by the division, the miner’s licenses and certifications shall be restored. In the event that the miner fails to successfully complete the evaluation, treatment, and drug test within one hundred twenty (120) days of the notification required under KRS 351.120(12), the miner’s licenses and certifications issued by the division shall be revoked for a period prescribed under KRS 351.990(8). The one hundred twenty (120) day time period set out in this section shall be extended upon proof that the miner is complying with the recommendations of the medical professional.

If the denial described in subsection (3) of this section occurs following the miner’s first offense as described in this section or KRS

351.120

, the miner shall not have the option of notifying the division of his or her intent to comply with subsection (3)(a)2. of this section. The miner shall only have the right to appeal the denial to the Mine Safety Review Commission within thirty (30) days of notification. If the miner fails to appeal the denial, the penalty shall be assessed according to KRS 351.990(8)(b) or (c).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 241, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 89, § 6, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 87, § 23, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 241, sec. 4, subsec. (2)(b), provides that certification shall be denied if “[t]he applicant’s blood alcohol level is above four tenths of one percent (.04) concentration at the time of test.” The words “four tenths of one percent” and the parentheses around “.04” were removed during codification to correct a manifest clerical error that occurred in the drafting process. Materials in the bill folder for House Bill 572 (which became
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 241) show that the bill was drafted to be an exact copy of a bill requested and later introduced as Senate Bill 201, the initial proposed draft of which provided for denial of certification if “[t]he applicant’s blood alcohol level is above .04 concentration at the time of testing.” Materials in the bill folder for Senate Bill 201 indicate that the erroneous phrase was inserted during the drafting process to conform with the rules for cardinal numbers set forth in the Bill Drafting Manual of the Kentucky General Assembly. The Reviser of Statutes has made this correction under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1).

351.185.
Confidentiality of drug and alcohol test results — Exceptions — Use of results in criminal proceeding against applicant prohibited.

Records of drug or alcohol test results, written or otherwise, received by the division, its contractors, subcontractors, or other employees are confidential communications and exempt from disclosure under the Kentucky Open Records Act, except as follows:

Where release of the information is authorized solely pursuant to a written consent form signed voluntarily by the person tested. The consent form shall contain the following:

The name of the person who is authorized to obtain the information;

The purpose of the disclosure;

The precise information to be disclosed;

The duration of the consent; and

The signature of the person authorizing the release of the information;

Where release of the information is compelled by a hearing officer or court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to an appeal taken under KRS

351.182

,

351.183

,

351.184

,

351.185

,

351.102

,

351.103

,

351.1041

,

351.106

,

351.110

,

351.120

,

351.127

,

351.1291

,

351.170

,

352.010

,

352.180

,

352.210

, and

352.390

;

Where release of the information is relevant to a legal claim asserted by the applicant;

Where the information is used by the entity conducting drug or alcohol testing when consulting with legal counsel in connection with matters brought under or related to KRS

351.182

,

351.183

,

351.184

,

351.185

,

351.102

,

351.103

,

351.1041

,

351.106

,

351.110

,

351.120

,

351.127

,

351.1291

,

351.170

,

352.010

,

352.180

,

352.210

, and

352.390

, or in its defense of civil or administrative actions related to the testing or results; or

Where release of the information is deemed appropriate by the Mine Safety Review Commission or a court of competent jurisdiction in disciplinary proceeding brought under the terms of KRS 351.182, 351.183, 351.184, 351.185, 351.102, 351.103, 351.1041, 351.106, 351.110, 351.120, 351.127, 351.1291, 351.170, 352.180, 352.210, and 352.390.

Information on drug and alcohol test results for tests administered pursuant to KRS

351.182

,

351.183

,

351.184

,

351.185

,

351.102

,

351.103

,

351.1041

,

351.106

,

351.110

,

351.120

,

351.127

,

351.1291

,

351.170

,

352.010

,

352.180

,

352.210

, and

352.390

shall not be released or used in any criminal proceeding against the applicant.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 241, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 87, § 24, effective June 24, 2015.

351.186.
Workers’ compensation premium — Credit for certified drug-free workplace program at coal mine.

Any employer who is also a licensee that has implemented a drug-free workplace program certified by the division shall be eligible to obtain a credit on the licensee’s premium for workers’ compensation insurance.

Each insurer authorized to write workers’ compensation insurance policies shall provide the credit on the workers’ compensation premium to any employer who is also a licensee for which the insurer has written a workers’ compensation policy. The credit on the workers’ compensation premium shall not:

Be available to those employers that are also licensees who do not maintain their drug-free workplace program for the entire workers’ compensation policy period; or

Apply to minimum premium policies.

The Department of Insurance shall approve workers’ compensation rating plans that give a credit on the premium for a certified drug-free workplace so long as the credit is actuarially sound. The credit shall be at least five percent (5%) unless the Department of Insurance determines that five percent (5%) is actuarially unsound.

The credit on the workers’ compensation premium may be applied by the insurer at the final audit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 241, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 1901, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 87, § 25, effective June 24, 2015.

351.190.
Mine rescue divisions and stations — Supplies and equipment.

The commissioner of the department shall partition the coal fields of the state into mine rescue divisions. In each division there shall be a station, the location of which shall be determined by the commissioner, and there shall be kept at each station apparatus, appliances, and supplies for use in the work of rescue and relief upon the occurrence of entrapments, roof falls, inundation of liquids or gases, explosions or mine fires, and for the training of officials and miners in mine rescue work. The commissioner shall provide each station and himself with the necessary instruments, appliances, apparatus, chemicals, trucks, and automobiles, and shall designate one (1) of the inspectors to have charge of each station.

History.

2739-14: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 298, § 17; 2006, ch. 185, § 12, effective July 12, 2006.

351.191.
Trained mine rescue team to be available within specified driving time of each mine.

Each underground coal mine operator shall submit documentation to the commissioner that a trained mine rescue team is within sixty (60) minutes’ driving time of each of his mines. In the event that a trained mine rescue team is not available as required, the department shall provide a trained mine rescue team which would be available to the mine within sixty (60) minutes’ driving time and shall so notify in writing the appropriate official of the United States Mine Safety and Health Administration.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 15; 1980, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

351.192.
Qualified or operator-designated person performing mine rescue acts not liable for damages for such acts.

Any person who is qualified by a federal or state agency to perform mine rescue planning and recovery operations, including mine rescue instructors and mine rescue team members, and any person designated by an operator furnishing a mine rescue team to supervise, assist in planning, or provide service thereto, who in good faith performs, or fails to perform, any act or service in connection with such mine rescue planning and recovery operations shall not be liable for any civil damages as a result of any such acts or omissions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 194, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2000, ch. 104, § 15, effective July 14, 2000.

351.193.
Safety rights of miners — Settlement of disputes.

No miner shall be required to operate any equipment or work in any condition which he reasonably believes to be unsafe. If the miner invokes his or her safety rights under this section, the miner shall have the right to be relieved from the assignment in dispute. The employee may be assigned to correct the condition or may be assigned to other duties until such time as the condition is resolved or corrected. No other miner shall be assigned to perform this job until the condition is corrected. The miner or his authorized representative and the company shall review the condition immediately and attempt to resolve the dispute. Should the miner not have an authorized representative, he may represent himself in the dispute. If the dispute is not settled by the company and the miner or his or her authorized representative, either party reserves the right to call in the commissioner or his authorized representative immediately and the dispute shall be settled on the basis of the inspector’s finding with a written copy of his finding given to the company and the miner and his authorized representative. In the event no representative of the miner exists, the employee shall have the right to have the dispute resolved based on the inspector’s findings. No disciplinary action shall be taken against a miner by a licensee unless the miner is found by the commissioner or his authorized representative to have acted in bad faith and without good cause in making an allegation as to unsafe equipment or working conditions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 370, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 308, § 17, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.194.
Administrative hearing procedures — Hearing regarding licensee, coal operation, or other person — Order — Enforcement — Civil penalty or fine.

The Mine Safety Review Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish administrative hearings procedures to be followed in determining if violations of mine safety laws, including, but not limited to, violations that meet the criteria established in KRS 351.025(1) or (2), have occurred and to establish a process to review recommended orders from any hearing officers acting on behalf of the commission. The procedures shall follow the requirements of KRS Chapter 13B and this chapter.

The chair or a majority of the Mine Safety Review Commission may convene a meeting of the commission at which it shall consider whether to schedule a hearing regarding any licensee, coal operation, or other person involved in the mining of coal.

If the commission determines that there is probable cause to believe that the licensee, coal operation, or other person against whom the department has made allegations of unsafe work practices or other violation of applicable law is guilty of an alleged violation, the commission shall schedule a hearing at which the department shall offer evidence in support of the allegations made by it. The licensee, coal operation, or other person against whom the allegations are made shall be given not less than twenty (20) days’ written notice of the charges against him, together with the date, time, and place at which the charges shall be heard, and of his opportunity to be represented by counsel, produce evidence and witnesses on his behalf, and examine the evidence and documents that may be produced against him. The commission may also be represented by counsel and shall not be bound by the technical rules of evidence, but its order shall be based upon competent evidence. Any licensee or other person summoned to appear at a hearing in the manner established in this subsection may, in writing, waive the notice required to be given to him.

The commission may proceed with its hearing of charges made by the department against any licensee, coal operation, or other person who, after being duly notified in accordance with the requirements of this section, fails to appear at or participate in the hearing and who fails to assert any legitimate basis for the failure.

Within ninety (90) days after hearing, the commission shall issue an order in which it sets out its determinations concerning each matter coming before it. Copies of the order shall be provided to all parties to the hearing. The department shall carry out or enforce, as appropriate, the order of the commission, which may include, though not be limited to, the imposition of civil penalties, revocation, suspension, or probation of the mine license or the miner’s certification.

The commission may modify a civil penalty or fine established under this chapter, under criteria established by the commission by administrative regulations.

In assessing monetary penalties within the limits provided in KRS

351.025

, the commission shall consider the operator’s history of previous violations, the appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the operator charged, whether the operator was negligent, the effect on the operator’s ability to continue in business, the gravity of the violation, the demonstrated good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve rapid compliance after notification of a violation, and whether a penalty has been imposed by the Federal Mine Safety and Health Act for a violation that arose out of the same set of facts or circumstances.

An appeal of an order of the commission shall be filed in the Franklin Circuit Court within thirty (30) days of entry of the order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 308, § 20, effective April 9, 1996; 1998, ch. 480, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 149, § 11, effective March 20, 2001; 2007, ch. 94, § 11, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.195.
Miners required to wear safety glasses. [Repealed.]

351.200.
Division of Geology — State Geologist. [Repealed.]

351.210.
Geological and other surveys — Custody of mineralogical collections. [Repealed.]

351.220.
Cooperative agreements for geological and similar surveys. [Repealed.]

351.230.
Maps and reports, distribution of. [Repealed.]

351.240.
Workmen’s Compensation. [Repealed.]